North Carolina, session 2025, SB528.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INCREASED ACCESS TO BIRTH CERTIFICATES
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 130A-93 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-93. Access to vital records; copies.
(a) Only the State Registrar shall have access to original vital records and to indices to
the original vital records. County offices authorized to issue certificates and the North Carolina
State Archives also shall have access to indices to these original vital records, when specifically
authorized by the State Registrar.
(b) The following birth data, in any form and on any medium, in the possession of the
Department, local health departments, or local register of deeds offices shall not be public records
pursuant to Chapter 132 of the General Statutes: the names of children and parents, the addresses
of parents (other than county of residence and postal code), and the social security numbers of
parents. Access to copies and abstracts of these data shall be provided in accordance with
G.S. 130A-99, Chapter 161 of the General Statutes, and this section. All other birth data shall be
public records pursuant to Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. All birth records and data are
State property and shall be managed only in accordance with official disposition instructions
prepared by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. The application of this Chapter
is subject to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 121 of the General Statutes, the North Carolina
Archives and History Act. The State Registrar and other officials authorized to issue certified
copies of vital records shall provide copies or abstracts of vital records, except those described
in subsections (d), (e), (e), (e1), (f) and (g) of this section, to any person upon request.
(c) The State Registrar and other officials authorized to issue certified copies of vital
records shall provide certified copies of vital records, except those described in subsections (d),
(e), (e), (e1), (f), and (g) of this section, only to the following:
(1) A person requesting a copy of the person's own vital records or that of the
person's spouse, sibling, direct ancestor or descendant, or stepparent or
stepchild;
(2) A person seeking information for a legal determination of personal or property
rights; or
*S528-v-4*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) An authorized agent, attorney or legal representative of a person described
above.
(c1) A funeral director or funeral service licensee shall be entitled upon request to a
certified copy of a death certificate.
(c2) An agency acting as a confidential intermediary in accordance with G.S. 48-9-104
shall be entitled to a certified copy of a death certificate upon request.
(d) Copies, certified copies or abstracts of birth certificates of adopted persons shall be
provided in accordance with G.S. 48-9-107.
(e) Copies or abstracts of the health and medical information contained on birth
certificates shall be provided only to a person requesting a copy of the health and medical
information contained on the person's own birth certificate, a person authorized by that person,
or a person who will use the information for medical research purposes. Copies of or abstracts
from any computer or microform database which contains individual-specific health or medical
birth data, whether the database is maintained by the Department, a local health department, or
any other public official, shall be provided only to an individual requesting his or her own data,
a person authorized by that individual, or a person who will use the information for medical
research purposes. purposes, or as permitted by subsection (e1) of this section. The State
Registrar shall adopt rules providing for the use of this information for medical research
purposes. The rules shall, at a minimum, require a written description of the proposed use of the
data, including protocols for protecting confidentiality of the data.
(e1) The State Registrar shall share copies or abstracts of information, including health
and medical information, contained on birth certificates with the following:
(1) The vital records jurisdiction of the county where the individual resides within
the State.
(2) Upon its request, a local, State, federal, or tribal public health agency for
public health purposes. As used in this subdivision, "local public health
agency" means the public health agency for the county in which the individual
resides within the State.
(f) Copies, certified copies or abstracts of new birth certificates issued to persons in the
federal witness protection program shall be provided only to a person requesting a copy of the
person's own birth certificate and that person's supervising federal marshall.marshal.
(g) No copies, certified copies or abstracts of vital records shall be provided to a person
purporting to request copies, certified copies or abstracts of that person's own vital records upon
determination that the person whose vital records are being requested is deceased.
(h) A certified copy issued under the provisions of this section shall have the same
evidentiary value as the original and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the
document. The State Registrar may appoint agents who shall have the authority to issue certified
copies under a facsimile signature of the State Registrar. These copies shall have the same
evidentiary value as those issued by the State Registrar.
(i) Fees for issuing any copy of a vital record or for conducting a search of the files when
no copy is made shall be as established in G.S. 130A-93.1 and G.S. 161-10.
(j) No person shall prepare or issue any certificate which purports to be an official
certified copy of a vital record except as authorized in this Article or the rules."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 130A-103 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-103. Registration of birth certificates more than five 10 days and less than one
year after birth.
Any birth may be registered more than five 10 days and less than one year after birth in the
same manner as births are registered under this Article within five 10 days of birth. The
registration shall have the effect as if the registration had occurred within five 10 days of birth.
The registration however, shall not relieve any person of criminal liability for the failure to
register the birth within five 10 days of birth as required by G.S. 130A-101."
Page 2 Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 130A-104(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Delayed certificates shall have the same evidentiary value as those registered within
five 10 days."
SECTION 1.(d) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026.

PART II. JOEL H. CRISP SUDEP AWARENESS LAW
SECTION 2.(a) The University of North Carolina School of Medicine's Area Health
Education Centers (NC AHEC) shall consult with the North Carolina Medical Board, North
Carolina Department of Health and Human Services, North Carolina Medical Society, North
Carolina Pediatric Society, North Carolina Academy of Family Physicians, North Carolina Board
of Nursing, North Carolina Board of Pharmacy, and North Carolina Nurses Association to gather
evidence-based information on sudden unexpected death in epilepsy from publications and
nonprofit organizations to create standard information to provide to all health care practitioners
in this State. The information shall include, at a minimum, current and evidence-based
information about sudden unexpected death in epilepsy risk factors and conditions and contact
information for nonprofit organizations that provide support services for epilepsy conditions. The
information shall be made available on NC AHEC's website and readily accessible to health care
practitioners in this State. No later than September 1, 2026, NC AHEC shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services a completed summary or
booklet of information provided to health care practitioners in the report.
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART III. VETERANS AND ELECTROENCEPHALOGRAM COMBINED
TRANSCRANIAL MAGNETIC STIMULATION TREATMENT PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.(a) The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall select a
provider to establish a statewide pilot program to make eTMS available for veterans, first
responders, and immediate family members of veterans and first responders experiencing one or
more of the conditions listed in subsection (b) of this section. For purposes of this act, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) Electroencephalogram combined Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation
Treatment (eTMS). – Treatment in which transcranial magnetic stimulation
frequency pulses are tuned to the patient's physiology and biometric data.
(2) Immediate family. – A spouse, child, stepchild, parent, or stepparent.
(3) Veteran. – A person who (i) served in the Armed Forces of the United States
on active duty, for reasons other than training, and has been discharged under
other than dishonorable conditions, (ii) served in a reserve component as
defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(27), and (iii) served in the National Guard of any
state.
SECTION 3.(b) The conditions that shall be the subject of the pilot program are the
following:
(1) Substance use disorders.
(2) Mental illness.
(3) Sleep disorders.
(4) Traumatic brain injuries.
(5) Sexual trauma.
(6) Posttraumatic stress disorder and accompanying comorbidities.
(7) Concussions.
(8) Other brain trauma.
(9) Quality of life issues affecting human performance, including issues related
to or resulting from problems with cognition and problems maintaining
attention, concentration, or focus.
Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(c) The provider selected by the Department to conduct the pilot
program must display a history of serving veteran and first responder populations at a statewide
level. The provider shall establish a network for in-person and off-site care with the goal of
providing statewide access. Consideration shall be provided to locations with a large population
of first responders and veterans. In addition to traditional eTMS devices, the provider may utilize
nonmedical portable magnetic stimulation devices to improve access to underserved populations
in remote areas or to be used to serve as a pre-post treatment or a stand-alone device. The provider
shall be required to establish and operate a clinical practice and to evaluate outcomes of such
clinical practice.
SECTION 3.(d) At a minimum, the pilot program shall include all of the following:
(1) The establishment of a peer-to-peer support network by the provider made
available to all individuals receiving treatment under the program.
(2) The requirement that each individual who receives treatment under the
program also must receive neurophysiological monitoring, monitoring for
symptoms of substance use and other mental health disorders, and access to
counseling and wellness programming. Each individual who receives
treatment must also participate in the peer-to-peer support network established
by the provider.
(3) The establishment of protocols which include the use of adopted stimulation
frequency and intensity modulation based on EEGs done on days 0, 10, and
20 and motor threshold testing, as well as clinical symptoms, signs, and
biometrics.
(4) The requirement that protocols and outcomes of any treatment provided by
the clinical practice shall be collected and reported by the provider not later
than September 15, 2027, to the Department, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government, and the Fiscal Research Division. The
report shall include the biometrics data and all expenditures made using State
funds.
SECTION 3.(e) The Department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 3.(f) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART IV. UPDATE OPIOID ABATEMENT TREATMENT PROGRAM RULES
SECTION 4.(a) The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities,
and Substance Use Services (Commission) shall amend the rules applicable to outpatient opioid
treatment programs (OTPs) in 10A NCAC 27G .3600 through 10A NCAC 27G .3605 to be more
consistent with 42 C.F.R. Part 8 governing medications for the treatment of opioid use disorder.
In amending these rules, the Commission shall make at least all of the following changes:
(1) Remove stability of a patient's home environment and social relationships as
an eligibility criterion for take-home medication.
(2) Require the State Opioid Treatment Authority (SOTA) to review patient
discharge policies related to continued substance use, missed doses, and
nonparticipation in ancillary services such as counseling.
(3) Remove structured counseling schedules to better align with federal
regulations that promote individualized care that is more patient-centered and
flexible.
(4) Reduce the number of required drug tests to align with the frequency required
by federal regulations.
(5) Explicitly permit OTPs to administer methadone to patients who are not
enrolled with the OTPs as their patients but can be verified as a patient in
Page 4 Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
another OTP through contacting the patient's home OTP, checking the central
registry, or other means established by the Commission.
SECTION 4.(b) In determining whether to include any additional changes to the
rules applicable to OTPs to achieve greater consistency with 42 C.F.R. Part 8, the Commission
shall engage with current and former OTP clients and OTP providers for input on other changes
that would serve the goal of improving access to patient-centered care and achieving better
alignment with federal regulations. However, the Commission shall not amend the rules to
include any input that is inconsistent with State or federal law.
SECTION 4.(c) The Commission shall publish the proposed text of the amended
rules applicable to OTPs by January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART V. REQUIRE SCHOOLS TO SHARE THE SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE
PHONE NUMBER AND NC PEER WARMLINE PHONE NUMBER
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding the following new subdivision
to read:
"(73) To Provide Students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline Phone Number and the
NC Peer Warmline Phone Number. – A local board of education shall adopt
a policy to ensure all schools in the local school administrative unit provide
students the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC
Peer Warmline. The board shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline
and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number
has changed, schools shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the schools shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this sub-subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(39) To provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number. – The board of trustees shall provide students
the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer
Warmline. The board shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and
the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the board shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the board shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this sub-subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) To Provide Students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline Phone Number and the NC Peer
Warmline Phone Number. – A charter school shall provide students the phone numbers for the
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The school shall verify that the phone
numbers for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone
number has changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated phone
number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, call
988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the
following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in grades
six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on the student ID.
The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this
subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) To provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number. – A regional school shall provide students the
phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline.
The school shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and the
Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this sub-subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(e) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) To provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number. – A laboratory school shall provide students
the phone numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer
Warmline. The school shall verify that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and
the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated
phone number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC
Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
Page 6 Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in
grades six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on
the student ID. The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker.
Nothing in this sub-subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
b. On the school website.
c. On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
d. On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
e. On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
f. On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(f) Part 1 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-550.2. Provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number.
Each private church school or school of religious charter shall provide students the phone
numbers for the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The school shall verify
that the phone numbers for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If
either phone number has changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an
updated phone number exists, the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call
855-733-7762" in the following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in grades
six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on the student ID.
The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this
subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(g) Part 2 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-558.2. Provide students the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline phone number and the NC
Peer Warmline phone number.
Each qualified nonpublic school shall provide students the phone numbers for the Suicide
and Crisis Lifeline and the NC Peer Warmline. The school shall verify that the phone numbers
for the Lifeline and the Warmline are current and accurate annually. If either phone number has
changed, the school shall use the updated phone number. Unless an updated phone number exists,
the school shall have the phrases "To reach the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, call 988 or text HOME
to 741741" and "To reach the NC Peer Warmline, call 855-733-7762" in the following places:
(1) On any new student identification (student ID) issued to a student in grades
six through 12. The text shall be in a conspicuous location on the student ID.
The text may be printed on the ID or affixed by sticker. Nothing in this
subdivision requires a school to issue a student ID.
(2) On the school website.
(3) On the home screen of any electronic device issued to students.
(4) On any school agenda or calendar, whether digital or printed.
(5) On a document during any suicide awareness activity.
(6) On a document when the student registers to attend the school."
SECTION 5.(h) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2026-2027 school year.

Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART VI. REAGAN'S LAW
SECTION 6.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-286. Prosthetic and orthotic devices and care.
(a) This section shall apply to all health benefit plans offered in this State other than those
regulated under Part 5 of Article 50 of this Chapter, Small Employer Group Health Insurance
Reform, or Article 50A of this Chapter, Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangements.
(b) Health benefit plan coverage shall include coverage for all prosthetic and orthotic
devices required to be covered by federal law or regulation under Medicare Part B, as detailed
under Part B of Subchapter XVIII of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the U.S. Code and Subpart D of
Part 414 of Subchapter B of Chapter IX of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Coverage
under this section shall include:
(1) All materials and components necessary to use a prosthetic or orthotic device.
(2) Instruction relating to the use of a prosthetic or orthotic device.
(3) Repair or replacement of a prosthetic or orthotic device meeting the
requirements of subsection (g) of this section.
(c) Coverage consistent with this section shall be required for all prosthetic or orthotic
devices, including custom devices, determined by the insured's healthcare provider to be the most
appropriate model to adequately meet the medical needs of the insured for completing activities
of daily living or essential job-related activities.
(d) Coverage under this section shall not be limited to one prosthetic or orthotic device.
In addition to coverage required under subsection (c) of this section, a health benefit plan shall
provide coverage for additional prosthetic or orthotic devices, including custom devices,
determined by the insured's healthcare provider to be the most appropriate model to adequately
meet the medical needs of the insured for either or both of the following:
(1) Performing physical activities, such as running, biking, swimming, and
strength training.
(2) Maximizing the insured's whole-body health and function of one or more
lower or upper limb.
(e) Coverage for prosthetic and orthotic devices, including custom devices, is considered
a habilitative or rehabilitative benefit, including for the purposes of any federal requirement for
the coverage of essential health benefits.
(f) An insurer shall not deny any health benefit claim for a prosthetic or orthotic device
for an insured with limb loss or absence that would otherwise be covered for any insured without
a disability seeking medical or surgical intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform
the same physical activity.
(g) A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for the replacement of a prosthetic or
orthotic device, or part of a prosthetic or orthotic device, and all of the following shall apply to
that coverage:
(1) The coverage shall be provided without regard to continuous use or useful
lifetime restrictions so long as the prescribing healthcare provider determines
that the provision of a replacement prosthetic or orthotic device, or a
replacement part of a prosthetic or orthotic device, is necessary for any of the
following reasons:
a. A change in the physiological condition of the insured.
b. An irreparable change in the condition of the device or part of the
device.
c. The condition of the device, or part of the device, requires one or more
repairs and the cost of the repair or repairs would be more than sixty
percent (60%) of replacement cost of the device or the parts requiring
replacement.
Page 8 Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An insurer may require confirmation from the prescribing healthcare provider
prior to replacement only if the device or the part of the device being replaced
is less than 3 years old.
(3) The coverage shall be provided for custom devices."
SECTION 6.(b) No later than February 1, 2029, each issuer that offers a health
benefit plan subject to G.S. 58-3-286 shall report to the Commissioner of the Department of
Insurance, in a form prescribed by the Commissioner, the number of claims and total amount of
claims paid for benefits required under G.S. 58-3-286.
SECTION 6.(c) No later than March 1, 2029, the Commissioner of the Department
of Insurance shall aggregate all data received under subsection (b) of this section by health benefit
plan year and provide this information in a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on General Government and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services.
SECTION 6.(d) This act is effective October 1, 2026, and applies to insurance
contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.

PART VII. HOSPITAL AND AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY STANDARDS
FOR SURGICAL SMOKE EVACUATION
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 131E-78.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-78.4. Hospital standards for surgical smoke evacuation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Smoke evacuation/filtering system. – Stand-alone, portable equipment
utilizing either an electrocautery device with a smoke removal collar or
assistant-held smoke evacuation device that effectively captures, filters, and
eliminates surgical smoke at the site of origin before the smoke makes contact
with the eyes or respiratory tracts of occupants in the room. This equipment is
not required to be interconnected to the hospital surgical ventilation or medical
gas system.
(2) Surgical smoke. – The gaseous by-product produced by energy-generating
devices, including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-generated
airborne contaminants, or lung-damaging dust.
(b) Policy Requirement. – Each hospital licensed under this Part shall adopt and
implement policies that require the use of a smoke evacuation/filtering system during any
surgical procedure that is likely to generate surgical smoke.
(c) Adverse Action. – The Department of Health and Human Services may take adverse
action against a hospital under G.S. 131E-78 for a violation of this section."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 131E-147.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-147.2. Ambulatory surgical facility standards for surgical smoke evacuation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Smoke evacuation/filtering system. – Equipment Stand-alone, portable
equipment utilizing either an electrocautery device with a smoke removal
collar or assistant-held smoke evacuation device that effectively captures,
filters, and eliminates surgical smoke at the site of origin before the smoke
makes contact with the eyes or the respiratory tracts of occupants in the room.
This equipment is not required to be interconnected to the ambulatory surgical
ventilation or medical gas system.
(2) Surgical smoke. – The gaseous by-product produced by energy-generating
devices, including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-generated
airborne contaminants, or lung-damaging dust.
Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Policy Requirement. – Each ambulatory surgical facility licensed under this Part shall
adopt and implement policies that require the use of a smoke evacuation/filtering system during
any surgical procedure that is likely to generate surgical smoke.
(c) Adverse Action. – The Department of Health and Human Services may take adverse
action against an ambulatory surgical facility under G.S. 131E-148 for a violation of this section."
SECTION 7.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART VIII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 10 Senate Bill 528-Fourth Edition